Utah statutes.
73-4-2.   Interstate streams.
For the purpose of co-operating with the state engineers of adjoining states
in the determination and administration of rights to interstate waters and for
such other purposes as he may deem expedient, the state engineer, with the
approval of the executive director and the governor, is authorized to initiate
and to join in suits for the adjudication of such rights in the federal courts
and in the courts of other states without requiring a petition of water users
as provided by Section 73-4-1. The state engineer, with the approval of the
executive director and the governor, may also commence, prosecute and defend
suits to adjudicate interstate waters on behalf of this state or its citizens
in the courts of other states, in federal courts, and in the Supreme Court of
the United States.
